Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-569
Abandoned real estate; sale; ordinance.

Before any sale of abandoned real estate is made by a city of the second class or village, the city council or village board of trustees shall by ordinance set forth the date of the purchase, gift, or condemnation, a description of the property, the purpose for which such real estate was acquired, the abandonment of the same, and that a sale is deemed expedient; shall fix the time, place, terms, and manner of sale; and shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids.

Laws 1911, c. 17, § 2, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 5178;

C.S.1922, § 4365;

C.S.1929, § 17-563;

R.S.1943, § 17-569;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 195.
August 24, 2017